California statutes. Water Code
-------------------------------------------

51751.

The board may maintain any action for the protection of the district’s rights in the unredeemed parcels, to the same extent as any other owner and the costs and expenses of such action or actions shall be a charge against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51752.

The board may expend district funds necessary to retire liens against an unredeemed parcel superior to the title of the county treasurer as trustee for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51753.

The board shall manage and control, and may lease for such reasonable rental and upon such terms as it deems advisable, and receive and collect the rental for all unredeemed parcels which remain unsold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51754.

The board may apply all rentals collected or moneys received by it from the lease of unredeemed, unsold parcels, or for the use or occupation of such parcels, to:

(a) The payment of the incidental expenses of holding and leasing the parcels. 

(b) The payment of any other incidental expenses of, or legal charge against the district.

(c) The purchase of outstanding district bonds matured or unmatured, with their coupons at not more than the face value of such bonds plus the accrued interest thereon.

(d) The payment of any call of any operation and maintenance assessment on any unredeemed, unsold parcel theretofore purchased by the county treasurer as trustee for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51755.

The bonds or coupons purchased by the board shall be forthwith delivered to the county treasurer and canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51756.

All rentals collected or moneys received from lease of parcels sold to the county treasurer as trustee for the district pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 of this part or for the use or occupation of such parcels, less the expenditures authorized by subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 51754, shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the bond fund of the district if the district is in default for interest or principal payment on any bonds issued by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51757.

An amount equal to the revenues derived from each parcel by reason of the leasing, use or occupation thereof, less the incidental expenses of leasing and holding same, shall be credited by the county treasurer on the assessment lists against the delinquent charges on the parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Cancellation, Refund and Reapportionment of Assessments [51800. - 51894.]



  ARTICLE 1. Unnecessary Assessments [51800. - 51810.]

51800.

When a district has levied an assessment and it appears to the board that it is unnecessary to collect all, or some portion of it, and it also appears to the board that the assessment or some part thereof is greater than required to meet all obligations incurred or to be incurred for the purposes for which the assessment or part thereof was levied, the board may, by resolution, request the board of supervisors to cancel all or any portion of the assessment including any interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51801.

The board shall specify in the resolution the portion of the assessment levied against each parcel which is to be canceled, describing each parcel as described in the assessment roll or by the number of the parcel as used in the assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51802.

The board of supervisors, upon receipt of the request, shall appoint a time when it will meet and hear any objections to the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51803.

Notice of the hearing shall be given as provided in Section 51244.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51804.

Objections shall be written, verified, and filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors, and no objection shall be considered by the board of supervisors or allowed in any other action or proceeding unless made in writing to the board of supervisors within 30 days after the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51805.

At the hearing the board of supervisors shall hear any evidence offered in support of the written objections and may approve, reject, modify or amend the request in any particular.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51806.

When an order is made approving, rejecting, modifying or amending the request, a certified copy of the order shall be attached to the assessment roll by the county treasurer in whose office the assessment roll is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51807.

When the order is attached to the assessment roll the secretary shall endorse upon the assessment roll after each parcel assessed the amount of the assessment as to each particular parcel which has been canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51808.

When a landowner, in any district in which the board of supervisors has canceled any assessment or portion thereof, has paid the assessment levied against his land, the board shall issue a warrant of the district in favor of the landowner in an amount equal to that portion of his assessment which was canceled, with legal interest thereon from the date of such payment to date of the warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51809.

The warrants shall be payable out of the fund of the district into which the proceeds of the assessments had been paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

51810.

No assessment or part thereof shall be canceled pursuant to this article if bonds based thereon and secured thereby have been issued and remain unpaid and provision has not been made for the payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Calls on Bonded Assessments [51830. - 51834.]

51830.

If an installment of any assessment has been called to pay the principal, interest, or principal and interest on any outstanding bonds secured by the assessment, and any of the bonds of such maturity have been refunded, or canceled, or not less than 90 percent of the bondholders have entered into and executed a plan for refunding the bonds or for the surrender and cancellation thereof, and by reason of any such facts the payment of the principal of such maturity of such outstanding bonds for which the call, in part or wholly, was levied is not required, the board shall, by resolution, cancel the call to the extent not required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51831.

A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed in the office of the county treasurer, and the county treasurer shall make the necessary entry in the records of his office to evidence the cancellation of the call.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51832.

The cancellation of any call pursuant to this article shall not be construed as reducing the assessment against any parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51833.

If any landowner has paid the whole or any part of the call so canceled, the county treasurer, upon demand of such landowner, shall refund to him the portion of the amount paid which is not so required, or, if no demand is made, shall hold that portion as a credit to the landowner on future calls against his land under the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51834.

This article is applicable with respect to all bonds which are exchanged for refunding bonds, or otherwise canceled, either before or after maturity, to any delinquency sale as to which the period of redemption has not expired, and to all parcels purchased by a county treasurer as trustee for the district as to which the period of redemption has expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cancellation Prior to Completion of Levy [51850. - 51850.]

51850.

When assessment commissioners have been appointed and an assessment has been partially or fully completed but has not been approved by the supervisors, and the board finds that the amount to be provided by the assessment is insufficient to pay the outstanding obligations or to pay for necessary new work, it may by resolution cancel all proceedings, and petition the board of supervisors to have prepared a new report and estimate, and appoint the same or new assessment commissioners to spread the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Erroneous Assessments and Invalid Calls [51870. - 51872.]

51870.

Any assessment erroneously made by reason of inadvertence or clerical mistake may be refunded upon order of the board at any time after payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51871.

When an assessment has been levied upon district lands and any installment of the assessment called by the board or by the county treasurer is adjudged invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, payments of the installment, including penalties and interest, made by any person before the call was adjudged invalid, may be credited by the treasurer of the county where the assessment list is filed on the assessment on which the invalid call was paid, and shall be applied to the payment of any subsequently called installment of the assessment on the parcel or upon demand, the county treasurer shall refund the amount of the installment adjudged invalid to the person who made the payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

51872.

When a parcel is sold by the county treasurer for nonpayment of a call of an installment of any assessment which is thereafter adjudged invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the court shall have power to set aside any and all proceedings or acts taken or had in connection with such sale and to cancel any certificate of sale and any deed made in pursuance of the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reapportioning Assessments [51890. - 51894.]

51890.

When any parcel located in a district upon which an assessment has been levied is divided, the board, upon written application signed by any or all of the landowners within the divided parcel, shall enter a minute order directing the reapportionment of the assessment upon the divided parcel in such manner as will charge each of the smaller parcels with a just proportion of the assessment.

When any parcel in a district is subdivided for the purposes of sale in accordance with Part 2 (commencing with Section 11000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, the subdivider shall make written application to the board for the reapportionment of any assessment of the district upon the parcels and the board shall proceed to make the reapportionment in the manner provided in this article. The expense of the reapportionment shall be paid by the subdivider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 104, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

51891.

If the application for reapportionment is signed by all of the landowners, the reapportionment is final upon entry of the minute order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51892.

If the application for reapportionment is not signed by all of the landowners within the divided parcel, the board upon making the minute order, shall file with the clerk of the board of supervisors a list of the charges assessed against each of the parcels, and the reapportionment shall be approved by the board of supervisors in the manner provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 51230) of Chapter 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 104, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

51892.5.

If no application for reapportionment is received under Section 51890, the district secretary may, upon learning that a parcel upon which an assessment has been levied has been divided or subdivided, reapportion the assessment against that parcel among each of the smaller parcels in proportion to the relative acreage contained in each parcel. The secretary shall give to each owner of the smaller parcels written notice of the reapportionment so determined, advising that the reapportionment will become final unless the owners, or any of them, within 10 days of the mailing of the notice, file with the secretary a written request for a hearing before the board to determine the manner in which the assessment shall be reapportioned. If no request is received, the reapportionment shall become final upon adoption by the board. If a request is received, the secretary shall give to the owner of each of the smaller parcels written notice not less than 10 days prior thereto that a hearing will be held by the board to determine the reapportionment. The determination of the board at the hearing shall be final unless, within 10 days thereafter, an objection is filed in writing with the secretary, in which event the board shall file its order of reapportionment with the clerk of the board of supervisors, and the reapportionment shall be approved by the board of supervisors in the manner provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 51230) of Chapter 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 104, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

51893.

The board shall require, as a condition to the making of any reapportionment pursuant to this article, that each parcel of the divided or subdivided parcel be given suitable means of ingress and egress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 104, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

51894.

When any assessment has been reapportioned on any parcel, the board shall cause the divisions or subdivisions and reapportionment to be properly entered or endorsed upon the assessment list, and shall file notice of all the changes with the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 104, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. BONDS AND REFUNDING BONDS [52100. - 52862.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [52100. - 52193.]



  ARTICLE 1. Form [52100. - 52106.]

52100.

The term bonds, as used in this chapter, includes bonds and refunding bonds, unless otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52101.

Bonds shall be of the denomination of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) each.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52102.

Bonds shall be signed by the president and attested by the county auditor of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52103.

Bonds shall be numbered consecutively in the order of their maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52104.

Bonds shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed 8 percent per year, payable on the first day of January and the first day of July in each year at the office of the county treasurer upon the presentation of the proper coupons therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

52105.

Coupons for each installment of interest shall be attached to the bonds and shall bear the facsimile signature of the county auditor of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52106.

The principal of bonds shall be made payable on the first day of July, or the first day of January in such years as the board prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Validating Proceedings [52120. - 52120.]

52120.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1543.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sale of Bonds [52150. - 52155.]

52150.

The county treasurer shall publish notice of the sale of bonds, at least once a week for two weeks prior to the sale, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52151.

The notice shall state that the county treasurer will sell a specified amount of bonds at the time and place specified therein, and ask sealed proposals for the purchase of the bonds, or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52152.

At the time stated in the notice of sale, the county treasurer shall open the bids and award the bonds to the highest responsible bidder as provided in Article 2, Chapter 2 of this part with respect to the sale of bonds or Article 3, Chapter 3 of this part with respect to the sale of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52153.

The date fixed for the sale of refunding bonds shall be at least 95 days prior to the maturity date of the principal of the bonds to be refunded by the sale of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52154.

The county treasurer may, and upon written request of a majority of the board, shall reject any and all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52155.

A record of the sale shall be made upon the books of the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Callable Bonds [52170. - 52179.]

52170.

The board may provide at any time before the sale of the bonds that the bonds shall be callable at face value, plus accrued interest, on any interest payment date, with or without a premium to be specified by the board, and inserted in the bonds. All other terms and conditions of the call shall be as provided by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

52171.

At least 120 days prior to any interest payment date, the board may, by a two-thirds vote, adopt an order calling any amount of callable bonds for payment on the interest payment date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52172.

Less than all of the bonds of any maturity may be called in inverse numerical order or by lot and, if called by lot, the board shall ascertain by a drawing the bonds to be called in such maturity by lot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

52173.

The order calling bonds shall specify the bonds to be called by number, maturity or such other designation as may be provided by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

52174.

A certified copy of the order shall be delivered to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52175.

The county treasurer shall add the principal of the bonds so called for redemption specified in the order, and any premium provided by those bonds to be paid upon such call, to the amount which he is required to collect for payment of the next maturing principal and interest of the outstanding bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

52176.

The county treasurer, in his notice of call of assessment, shall specify the amount which is included for payment of principal of and interest on the bonds to be called and premium thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

52177.

The county treasurer shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the principal county once a week for four weeks prior to the date on which bonds are called for payment, a notice of the call of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52178.

The notice of the call of bonds shall contain a reference to the order of the board calling the bonds and a notification to all holders of bonds so called to present the bonds for payment on the date specified in the notice. The notice of call shall further state that whenever, on or after the call date specified in the notice, funds are received by the county treasurer for payment of the bonds, coupons and premium, all interest thereon shall cease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

52179.

In the event the bonds are callable at a premium, the board shall draw a warrant or warrants in favor of the county treasurer from time to time as bonds are called for redemption in an amount equal to the amount of the premium required to be paid on the bonds then called for redemption. Each such warrant shall be drawn against funds derived from the additional or supplemental assessment required to be levied pursuant to Section 51301.5. The amounts collected on such additional or supplemental assessment shall be used by the county treasurer for the payment of the premium on the bonds then called for redemption and, to the extent of such payment, such warrant shall be
 reduced or canceled by endorsement on the reverse thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bond Fund [52190. - 52193.]

52190.

All money, including interest and penalties, derived by sale, or otherwise, from an assessment against which bonds have been issued, and amounts of purchase money paid in bonds or coupons on delinquency sales made for such assessments, shall be credited to the bond fund of the district, except as provided in Section 51644.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52191.

The county treasurer shall charge to the bond fund the expenses of publication and such other incidental expenses of the county treasurer as are necessarily incurred by him in collecting and disbursing the moneys received and disbursed by him, as well as the cost of keeping such additional records as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this division relating to bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52192.

All claims by the county treasurer and the expenditures shall be first approved by the board, and a warrant shall be drawn by the board on the bond fund in favor of the county treasurer in payment for such expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52193.

The county treasurer shall transfer the balance remaining in the bond fund, after payment in full of the principal and interest of all outstanding bonds, to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bonds [52200. - 52302.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [52200. - 52208.]

52200.

All provisions of Chapter 1 of this part are applicable to bonds issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52201.

When any assessment, except an operation and maintenance assessment, levied and assessed upon district lands remains unpaid in whole or in part and, in the judgment of the board it would be for the best interest of the district or the landowners therein to issue bonds to obtain money to pay the cost of reclamation, the indebtedness of the district, or any other legal charge, or when a petition signed by the owners of more than one-half of the land in the district is filed with the secretary, the board, by order entered upon its records, shall order a special election to be held at some place in the district to be designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52202.

At the special election the board shall submit to the landowners the question of whether bonds shall be issued in an amount equal to the amount of such assessment, or the part of such assessment remaining unpaid, which amount shall be entered by the board in its records and stated by it in the order for the special election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52203.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of the issuance of bonds, the board shall cause the amount of bonds stated in the order for the election to be executed and delivered, with the assessment list, to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52204.

If the board deems it advisable, it may order a special election to be held prior to making any assessment, to determine whether bonds shall be issued for an amount to be stated in the order for the election, but no bonds shall, in such instance, be issued until an assessment for the amount of the bonds authorized at the election has been made and filed with the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52205.

The county treasurer shall place the bonds to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52206.

The bonds shall be payable serially within 20 years from their date, as follows:

(a) Not less than 10 percent of the aggregate face value of bonds issued shall be payable within 10 years from their date.

(b) Not less than 10 percent of the aggregate face value of bonds remaining unpaid at the end of 10 years shall be payable each year beginning with the eleventh (11th) year from their date, until the whole amount of the bonds is paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52207.

The bonds shall be substantially in the following form: Form of Bonds
 United States of America
 State of CaliforniaCounty of ______No. _____$ ______Reclamation District ______Reclamation District No. ____, for value received hereby acknowledges itself indebted to and promises to pay to the holder hereof at the office of the treasurer of said county, in the State of California, on the first day of ____, 19_, the sum of ____ dollars ($____), in lawful money of the United States of America, with interest thereon in lawful money from date hereof until paid, at the rate of ____ percent, per year, payable at the office of said treasurer on the first day of January, and the first day of July in each year on presentation and surrender of the interest coupons hereto attached.

This bond is one of a series of ____ bonds of like tenor and effect, except as to denomination and maturity, numbered from ____ to ____ inclusive, amounting in the aggregate to ____ dollars ($____), issued in
 accordance with Division 15 of the Water Code of the State of California pursuant to an election held in said reclamation district on the ____ day of ____, 19_, authorizing its issuance, and is based upon and secured by an assessment levied on the lands in said district, and filed in the Office of the County Treasurer of said County of ____, on the ____ day of ____, 19_, and the said reclamation district does hereby certify and declare that said election was duly called and held upon due notice, and the result thereof was duly canvassed and ascertained, in pursuance of and in strict conformity with the laws of the State of California applicable thereto, and that all of the acts and conditions and things required by law to be done, precedent to and in the issue of said bonds have been done and have been performed in regular and in due form and in strict accordance with the provisions of the law authorizing the issuance of reclamation bonds.

In the testimony whereof,
 the said district, by its board of trustees, has caused this bond to be signed by the president of said board and attested by the Auditor of said County of ____ with his seal of office affixed this ____ day of ____, 19_.President of said board Attest Auditor of the County of , State of
 California

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52208.

The interest coupons may be substantially in the following form: No. ________$ _______The County Treasurer of ____ County, California, will pay to the holder hereof on the ____ day of ____, 19_, at his office
 in said County of ____, the sum of ____ dollars ($____) in lawful money of the United States out of the funds of Reclamation District No. ____ for interest on bonds of said district numbered ____.County Auditor

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sale [52220. - 52228.]

52220.

When directed by resolution of the board, the county treasurer may sell all or any designated number of the bonds for the best price obtainable, but in no event for less than 90 percent of the face value of the bonds and the accrued interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52221.

The bonds shall be sold in the manner provided in Article 3 of Chapter 1 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52222.

The county treasurer may accept in full or partial payment for bonds, outstanding warrants of the district at face value plus the accrued interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52223.

When bonds have been authorized prior to payment of an assessment during the 30-day period allowed by Section 51510, the amount of bonds to be sold shall be reduced and canceled in an amount equal to the assessment paid during that period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

52224.

The reduction and cancellation of bonds not to be sold shall be only in the latest maturities and the minute order directing such reduction and cancellation shall be entered by the board and a copy thereof, certified by the president, filed with the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

52225.

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the county treasury to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52226.

A sale and delivery of the bonds by the county treasurer is conclusive evidence in favor of the purchaser and all subsequent holders of the bonds that the sale was made upon due authority and notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52227.

The board may draw demand warrants upon the county treasurer against the funds provided by sale of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52228.

Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter which have been investigated and certified by any officer of this state authorized to make such investigation and certification, and declared to be legal for investments by savings banks of the state, may be purchased, or received in pledge for loans by savings banks, trust companies, insurance companies, guardians, conservators, executors, administrators and special administrators, or by any public officer or officers of this state or of any county, city, or other municipal or corporate body within this state having or holding funds which they are authorized to invest or loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Additional Series [52240. - 52241.]

52240.

When any district, having authorized the issuance of a series of bonds, issues an additional series based on another assessment, the dates of maturity of the additional series shall be such that the latest maturities thereof do not exceed 30 years, and the earliest maturity shall be later than the latest maturity of bonds of any earlier series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52241.

The provisions of this part relative to the original issue of bonds shall apply to additional series of bonds so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Exchange [52260. - 52262.]

52260.

Any district which has issued bonds of different denominations, may, by order entered in its minutes, upon request of holders thereof, and upon the deposit of the outstanding bonds with the board, issue to the holders of the deposited bonds, bonds in the same form but in different denominations having the same aggregate face value and maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52261.

Exchange bonds shall be executed by all persons required by law to execute the bonds for which the exchange is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52262.

Bonds deposited for exchange shall be canceled by the county treasurer and the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Cancellation [52280. - 52285.]

52280.

The board, by an order entered in its minutes, may cancel all proceedings taken in connection with bonds remaining unsold one year after they are delivered to the county treasurer, or which are not delivered to the county treasurer within one year from the date of the election authorizing the issuance thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52281.

A certified copy of the order shall be filed with the county treasurer of each county wherein lands affected by the assessment on which the bonds were based are situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52282.

Upon receipt of the order, the county treasurer to whom the unsold bonds have been delivered shall cancel the unsold bonds and all coupons attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52283.

Cancellation of unsold or unissued bonds shall not affect the validity of the assessment upon which the bonds were issued, and the board may call for the payment of any part of the assessment as provided in Section 51517 or may cause bonds to be authorized and issued upon the unpaid portion of such assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52284.

When a portion of any bond issue is canceled, the board shall call the portion of the assessment securing the canceled bonds, in such installment or installments as the said board shall determine, and the amount collected shall be deposited in the county treasury and paid out on warrants of the district in the order of their registration drawn in payment of costs for the payment of which the assessment was levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52285.

Calls of assessments pursuant to Section 52284 shall be limited to amounts which will leave uncalled a sufficient portion of the assessment to pay principal and interest on the outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [52300. - 52302.]

52300.

The provisions of this division as to the procedure for calling assessments to meet payments of principal or interest of bonds, the provisions of Section 51258, and the provisions of this division relating to refunding bonds, shall apply to and inure to the benefit of bonds which were issued prior to July 27, 1917.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52301.

In all cases where it is provided in this division that bonds and interest coupons may be used in lieu of cash, and the entire amount of any bonds or coupons tendered is not required to complete the particular transaction, the county treasurer shall endorse thereon, as paid, the amount thereof which is tendered for payment or cancellation, and shall endorse on the unmatured coupons attached to such bond the amount for which the unmatured coupons are redeemable, the amount to be computed on the unpaid portion of the bond at the rate of interest provided in the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

52302.

Bonds and interest coupons which are, without bad faith on the part of the holder, lost, destroyed, or so mutilated as to impair their value to the holder, may be replaced by the issuance of duplicates in the manner provided with respect to warrants in Part 9, Chapter 2, Article 3 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Revenue Bonds [52400. - 52402.]

52400.

As an alternate to any other method of financing available to it, a district may, by resolution or indenture, create a special indebtedness evidenced by revenue bonds to finance the costs of carrying out a plan for any works, singly or as a whole.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

52401.

The proceedings for the issuance of revenue bonds shall be had, the district shall have the powers and duties, and the bondholders shall have the rights and remedies, all in substantial accordance with and with like legal effect as provided in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code); provided, however, that when such proceedings are requested by the affirmative action of a majority or more of the voters in the district, no election shall be had, nor shall such action be subject to referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

52402.
